Idaho statutes. Title 36 FISH AND GAME
Chapter 4 LICENSES TO HUNT, FISH AND TRAP
§ 36-408. Commission’s authority — Tags — Permits — Nonresidents limited — Outfitters set-aside. — (1) Tags and Permits

Method of Use. The commission is hereby authorized to prescribe the number and kind of wildlife that may be taken under authority of the several types of tags and permits provided for in this title and the manner in which said tags and permits shall be used and validated.

(2) Limit — Licenses, Tags or Permits — Controlled Hunts. The commission is hereby authorized to establish a limit annually as to the number of each kind and class of licenses, tags, or permits to be sold or issued and is further authorized to limit the number or prohibit entirely the participation by nonresidents in controlled hunts.

(3) Outfitted Hunter Tags Set-Aside. When the commission establishes a limit as to the number of nonresident deer tags and nonresident elk tags, it shall set aside, when setting big game seasons, in a statewide pool, a maximum of twenty-five percent (25%) of the nonresident deer tag and nonresident elk tag limit. These tags may be allocated to the outfitted hunters in capped hunts and controlled hunts and set aside for outfitted hunter use in general hunts.

Such outfitted allocated set-aside tags shall be separate from the tag numbers set for residents and nonresidents in each capped or controlled hunt, unit, or game management area. The set-aside tags shall be sold pursuant to commission rule, only to persons that have entered into a signed agreement for that year to utilize the services of an outfitter licensed pursuant to chapter 21, title 36, Idaho Code.

In order for a person to purchase any set-aside nonresident deer tag or nonresident elk tag, that person’s outfitter must submit an application with the proper fees as required by the director. If any nonresident deer tags or nonresident elk tags set aside for use in general hunts pursuant to this subsection are unsold by July 15 of the year in which they were set aside, they may be sold by the department to the general public pursuant to commission rule. If any nonresident deer tags or nonresident elk tags set aside as general capped allocated tags pursuant to this subsection are unsold by July 31 of the year in which they were set aside, they may be sold by the department to the general public pursuant to commission rule.

The commission may promulgate all necessary rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

(4) Deer and Elk Tag Allocation. When setting big game seasons, if the commission limits the number of deer or elk tags available for use in any game management area, unit, or zone, the commission may allocate by rule, where there are outfitted operations, a number of deer and elk tags from the outfitted hunter set-aside pool of tags for use by hunters that have entered into a signed agreement for that year to utilize the services of an outfitter licensed pursuant to chapter 21, title 36, Idaho Code.

In addition to rules promulgated by the commission regarding allocation, or pursuant to this section, in capped hunts the commission may allocate the number of outfitted hunter elk and deer tags based on the highest number within each of the last two (2) years of all elk or deer tags using the services of an outfitter in each capped hunt. Any additional tags above the original outfitted hunter tag quota may come from the nonresident outfitted hunter set-aside pool or the nonresident quota in the capped hunt, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the nonresident quota for each capped hunt. In capped hunts, when tag numbers change for all users, they will apply proportionally to all user groups.
In controlled hunts, the commission may allocate the number of outfitted hunter elk or deer tags based on a number compiled from each outfitter’s highest year within the last two (2) years of all elk or deer tags using the services of an outfitter for each controlled hunt. Any additional tags above the original outfitted hunter tag quota may come from the nonresident outfitted hunter set-aside pool or the nonresident quota in the controlled hunt, not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the nonresident quota for each controlled hunt.

Outfitted hunter tag use history will be provided through records from the sale of outfitted hunter tags compiled by the Idaho department of fish and game and verified use other than allocated tags recorded with the department by December 20 by outfitters. The department shall distribute the allocated outfitted tags through its point-of-sale machines.

Beginning December 1, 2020, all outfitted deer and elk tag use shall be verified in order to qualify for allocated outfitted hunter tag use history. Verification consists of the purchase of allocated tags from the Idaho department of fish and game or the use of an outfitter-provided agreement, including the tag number that is recorded with the department.

All big game tags used in allocated outfitted hunts must be recorded by outfitters with the department by December 20 each year. An administrative fee of five dollars ($5.00) shall be assessed for each allocated outfitted big game tag sold or exchanged at a point-of-sale machine. An administrative fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be assessed for each big game tag submitted for verification as being outfitted.

The allocated tags shall be designated by the Idaho outfitters and guides licensing board to those authorized outfitting operations licensed for elk and deer hunting for the use by the outfitted hunter, pursuant to section 36-2107(i), Idaho Code.

Those tags not qualified for allocated tag use history include emergency depredation, landowner appreciation program hunts, or meat packing without an outfitted allocated deer or elk tag.

The commission may promulgate all necessary rules to implement the provisions of this subsection.

(5) Special Game Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue two (2) special bighorn sheep tags per year.

Auction bighorn sheep tag. One (1) special bighorn sheep tag shall be auctioned off by an incorporated nonprofit organization dedicated to wildlife conservation selected by the commission. The tag shall be issued by the department of fish and game to the highest eligible bidder. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds for the tag may be retained by the organization. The tag to be issued pursuant to this subsection shall be taken from the nonresident bighorn sheep tag quota. The net proceeds shall be forwarded to the director for deposit in the fish and game expendable trust account and shall be used for bighorn sheep research and management purposes. Moneys raised pursuant to this subsection may not be used to transplant additional bighorn sheep into that portion of southwest Idaho south of the Snake river and west of U.S. highway no. 93, nor for litigation or environmental impact statements involving bighorn sheep. No transplants of bighorn sheep accomplished with moneys raised pursuant to this subsection shall occur in any area until hearings are conducted in the area. Provided however, that none of the proceeds generated from the auction of bighorn sheep tags pursuant to this paragraph be used to purchase or acquire private property or federally managed grazing permits, nor shall any proceeds generated be used for matching funds for the purchase of private property or the retirement or the acquisition of federally managed grazing permits.
(b) Lottery bighorn sheep tag. The commission is also authorized to issue one (1) special bighorn sheep tag, which will be disposed of by lottery. The lottery permit can be marketed by the department of fish and game or a nonprofit organization dedicated to wildlife conservation selected by the commission. The tag will be issued by the department of fish and game to an eligible person drawn from the lottery provided in this subsection. No more than twenty-five percent (25%) of gross revenue can be retained for administrative costs by the organization. All net proceeds for the tag disposed of by lottery pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the department and deposited in the fish and game expendable trust account. Moneys in the account from the lottery bighorn sheep tag shall be utilized by the department in solving problems between bighorn sheep and domestic sheep, solving problems between wildlife and domestic animals or improving relationships between sportsmen and private landowners.

(6) Issuance of Free Permit or Tag to Minor Children with Life-Threatening Medical Conditions. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may issue free big game permits or tags to minor children who have life-threatening medical conditions that have been certified eligible by a qualified organization. The commission may prescribe by rule the manner and conditions of issuing and using the permits or tags authorized under this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, a “qualified organization” means a nonprofit organization that is qualified under section 501(c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that affords opportunities and experiences to minor children with life-threatening medical conditions.

(7) Issuance of Free Permit or Tag to Military Veterans with Disabilities. The commission may prescribe by rule the manner and conditions of using the permits or tags authorized under this subsection. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall issue five (5) free big game permits or tags to disabled military veterans whose disability has been certified eligible by the Idaho division of veterans services. All veterans applying must be sponsored by a “qualified organization,” which for purposes of this subsection means a governmental agency that assists veterans or a nonprofit organization that is qualified under section 501(c) (3), 501(c) (4) or 501(c) (19) of the Internal Revenue Code and that affords opportunities, experiences and assistance to disabled veterans. The Idaho division of veterans services shall screen all applicants to ensure only the most deserving disabled veterans shall be issued these permits or tags. A list of screened applicants shall be provided to the commission in priority order for issuance. The commission shall issue one (1) permit or tag each to the top two (2) candidates for a sponsored hunt as designated by the Idaho division of veterans services and the three (3) remaining permits or tags to candidates sponsored by a qualified organization as described in this subsection.

(8) Special Wolf Tags. The commission is hereby authorized to issue up to ten (10) special auction or lottery tags for hunting wolves. Special wolf tags will be auctioned off or made available through lottery by incorporated nonprofit organizations dedicated to wildlife conservation and selected by the director. No more than five percent (5%) of all proceeds for each tag may be retained by the nonprofit organization for administrative costs involved. Each wolf tag shall be issued by the department of fish and game and awarded to the highest eligible bidder or winner of a lottery. Each tag will be good for the harvest of one (1) wolf pursuant to commission rule. The proceeds from each tag will be sent to the director to be placed in the department general license fund.

§ 36-409. Game tags — Permits — Fees — Penalty.

Resident Game Tags. A resident who has obtained authorization to hunt, as provided in section 36-401, Idaho Code, or has purchased or obtained a license to hunt, as provided in section 36-406, Idaho Code, upon payment of the fees provided in this chapter shall be eligible to receive a resident game tag to hunt and kill a moose, bighorn sheep, mountain goat, elk, deer, antelope, mountain lion, black bear, grizzly bear, wolf, sandhill crane, swan, or turkey in accordance with the laws of this state and rules promulgated by the commission; provided further, that any person who holds a senior resident combination license or any person who holds a junior combination or hunting license or any disabled American veteran who holds a disabled combination license, may be issued a black bear, deer, elk, or turkey tag for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code; provided further, that resident game tags may be issued only to those persons who meet residency requirements of section 36-202(s), Idaho Code. In the event an emergency is declared to open a season to protect private property as provided in section 36-106(e)6.(B), Idaho Code, the affected landowner or his designee shall be eligible to receive a resident deer, elk or antelope tag without charge; provided further, that resident game tags may be issued only to persons who qualify as residents pursuant to section 36-202, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Game Tags. A nonresident who has purchased a license to hunt, as provided in section 36-407(a) or (k), Idaho Code, or has obtained a license to hunt, as provided in section 36-406(e), Idaho Code, or a resident who has purchased or obtained a license or authorization to hunt, as provided in section 36-401 or 36-406, Idaho Code, upon payment of the fees provided in this chapter, shall be eligible to receive a nonresident tag to hunt and kill a moose, bighorn sheep, mountain goat, elk, deer, antelope, mountain lion, black bear, grizzly bear, wolf, sandhill crane, swan, or turkey in accordance with the laws of this state and rules promulgated by the commission; provided further, that a nonresident who has purchased a license to hunt, as provided in section 36-407(k) and (
l
), Idaho Code, shall be eligible to receive a junior mentored or disabled American veteran deer, elk, black bear, or turkey tag for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Game Tags Required. The appropriate tag must be had for the hunting or taking of each and every one of the aforementioned wildlife. The commission shall promulgate rules to allow exception from tag possession to take wildlife for a disabled hunter companion who is assisting a hunter possessing the appropriate tag and a valid disabled combination license or a disabled archery permit or a disabled hunt motor vehicle permit or who is a disabled veteran participating in a hunt as provided in section 36-408(7), Idaho Code. Provided, that the commission may promulgate rules to allow a nonresident deer or elk tag to be used to hunt and kill a black bear, a wolf, or a mountain lion during the open season for deer or elk in that area, unit or zone as may be specified by the commission. All of said tags are to bear and have serial numbers.

Game Tag to Be Validated and Attached to Carcass. As soon as any person kills any wildlife for which a tag is required, said tag, belonging to him, must be validated and attached to said wildlife in a manner provided by commission rule.

Archery Permits. In addition to meeting the license and tag requirements provided in this chapter, any person participating in any controlled or general game season that has been specifically designated as an archery hunt must have in his possession an archery hunt permit, which may be purchased for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Muzzleloader Permit. In addition to meeting the license and tag requirements provided in this chapter, any person participating in any controlled or general game season that has been specifically designated as a muzzleloader hunt must have in his possession a muzzleloader permit, which may be purchased for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Hound Hunter Permit — Resident — Nonresident. Any person using a dog for the purpose of hunting or for taking, as defined in section 36-202, Idaho Code, big game or furbearing animals must have in his possession a valid hound hunter permit, which may be purchased by resident and nonresident license holders for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Nonresident Bird of Prey Capture Permit. The commission may, under rules as it may prescribe, issue a nonresident bird of prey capture permit. This capture permit may be purchased by any licensed nonresident falconer for capturing birds of prey in Idaho. The fee for the permit shall be as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, and the permit shall be issued under the condition that the nonresident’s home state allows reciprocal raptor capturing privileges for Idaho falconers.

Upland Game Bird Permit. The commission may, under rules as it may prescribe, issue an upland game bird permit that must be purchased by all persons over seventeen (17) years of age prior to hunting stocked upland game birds on department-owned lands, lands managed under agreement with the department, and private lands enrolled in a department-sponsored public access program with written permission of the land owner. The fee for the permit shall be as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Black Bear Baiting Permit. The commission may, under rules as it may prescribe, issue a black bear baiting permit. Any person placing or using bait as may be allowed by rule for the purpose of attracting black bear must have in his possession a valid black bear baiting permit, which may be purchased by a license holder for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Migratory Bird Harvest Information Program Permit. The commission may, as provided by federal laws or regulations and under rules as it may prescribe, issue a migratory bird harvest information program permit that must be purchased by all persons prior to hunting migratory game birds as required by federal law or regulations. The fee for the permit shall be as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

Dog Field Trial Permit. The commission may, under rules as it may prescribe, issue a dog field trial permit to any person using birds for dog field trials or training as may be allowed by rule. The permit may be purchased for a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code.

§ 36-409A. Disabled archery provisions.

When the commission has established a special archery only season, any individual who is otherwise qualified to participate, shall be allowed to do so with the use of a crossbow if he has a permanent disability whereby he does not have use of one (1) or both of his arms or hands.

The commission shall promulgate rules to establish a process for verifying the existence of the disability and for issuance of a free permit to qualifying individuals.

§ 36-410. Steelhead trout — Anadromous salmon permits.

No person shall fish for steelhead trout or anadromous salmon except as herein provided:

Permits Required — Fee. Any person holding a valid fishing or combined fishing and hunting license of a class and kind mentioned in section 36-406 or in subsections (b) and (i) of section 36-407, Idaho Code, may purchase, in accordance with the rules promulgated by the commission, steelhead trout permits and/or anadromous salmon permits at a fee as specified in section 36-416, Idaho Code, for each kind of permit. The person to whom such permits are issued shall then be entitled to fish for and take steelhead trout and/or anadromous salmon subject to the limitations prescribed in this title and rules promulgated by the commission. Permits shall be valid only during the period of time that the corresponding basic license is valid.

Unlicensed Resident. Bona fide residents of Idaho who are expressly exempt from license requirements to fish in the public waters of the state may choose one (1) of the following options:

Purchase and use such permits as an individual; or

May fish for and take steelhead trout and/or anadromous salmon without having permits therefor if accompanied by a properly licensed permit holder, provided that any such fish caught shall be included in the daily, seasonal and possession limit of the accompanying licensed permit holder.

Unlicensed Nonresident Children. Unlicensed nonresident children under the age of fourteen (14) years shall not be eligible to obtain a steelhead trout or anadromous salmon permit, but may take such fish if accompanied by a holder of a valid license and permit, provided that any steelhead trout or anadromous salmon caught by such children shall be included in the daily, seasonal and possession limit of the accompanying licensed permit holder.

§ 36-411. Certificate of completion.

Hunter education. No hunting license shall be issued to a person born after January 1, 1975, unless the person has previously held a valid hunting license in this or another state or unless such person presents to the department of fish and game or one of its authorized license vendors, a certificate of completion in hunter education issued by the department under the hunter education program or proof that he holds the equivalent of such a certificate obtained either in Idaho or from an authorized agency or association of another state or country.

Archery education. On and after January 1, 1994, no person shall be issued an archery permit unless that person presents to the department a certificate of completion in archery education issued by the department, or proof that such person holds the equivalent of such a certificate obtained either in Idaho or from an authorized agency or association in another state, or proof that such person has previously held a valid archery permit in Idaho or another state or country.

§ 36-412. Education programs — Instructor qualifications — Fee.

The fish and game commission shall prescribe and administer education programs in hunting, trapping and archery. Such programs shall provide instruction in the safe handling of lawful hunting and trapping equipment. The programs shall also include instruction on wildlife and natural resource conservation, good conduct and respect for the rights and property of others, and survival in the outdoors. The commission may enter into agreements with public or private agencies and individuals in carrying out the provisions of this subsection.

The department of fish and game shall recruit competent volunteer instructors. The department shall provide training for the instructors in the safe handling of legal hunting and trapping equipment, conservation of wildlife and natural resources, good conduct and respect for the rights and property of others, outdoor survival, and other appropriate subjects for training instructors. Instructors shall be issued certificates and shall on a voluntary basis give instruction in education programs as established by the department of fish and game to all eligible applicants.

The commission shall establish fees for each program not to exceed eight dollars ($8.00) for persons who are age seventeen (17) years and under and not to exceed eight dollars ($8.00) for persons age eighteen (18) years and older, to be assessed each individual obtaining instruction in hunter education or trapping education for reimbursement for furnished materials. All students successfully completing the course of instruction shall be issued a certificate of completion.

§ 36-412A. Education programs — Fines and forfeitures

Local shooting ranges. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2020, ch. 85, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 36-413. Lifetime license certificate — Fee.

The fish and game commission shall issue rules and regulations to administer a lifetime license certificate system.

A lifetime license certificate may be sold to any person who qualifies as a resident or is granted resident license privileges as provided in subsection (s) of section 36-202, Idaho Code.

A lifetime certificate may be obtained by a person one (1) day of age through one (1) year of age possessing the qualifications therein described upon payment of twenty-five (25) times the fee prescribed for a combined hunting and fishing license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a combined hunting and fishing license certificate; twenty-five (25) times the fee prescribed for a hunting license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a hunting license certificate; or twenty-five (25) times the fee prescribed for a fishing license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a fishing license certificate.

A lifetime certificate may be obtained by a person two (2) years of age through fifty (50) years of age possessing the qualifications therein described upon payment of thirty-five (35) times the fee prescribed for a combined hunting and fishing license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a combined hunting and fishing license certificate; thirty-five (35) times the fee prescribed for a hunting license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a hunting license certificate; or thirty-five (35) times the fee prescribed for a fishing license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a fishing license certificate.

A lifetime certificate may be obtained by a person fifty-one (51) years of age or older possessing the qualifications therein described upon payment of twenty (20) times the fee prescribed for a combined hunting and fishing license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a combined hunting and fishing license certificate; twenty (20) times the fee prescribed for a hunting license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a hunting license certificate; or twenty (20) times the fee prescribed for a fishing license in section 36-406(a) [36-416(a)], Idaho Code, for a fishing license certificate.

Holders of lifetime license certificates shall be subject to the provisions of title 36, Idaho Code.

The director shall promptly transmit to the state treasurer all moneys received by him from the sale of lifetime license certificates and the state treasurer shall deposit all such moneys in the fish and game trust account [fund]. All such moneys shall be expended at the direction of the commission to carry out the purposes of the Idaho fish and game code or any law or regulation promulgated for the protection of wildlife, and shall be used for no other purpose.

§ 36-414. Depredation and sportsman access programs — License endorsement.

To purchase an annual hunting, fishing, combination or trapping license, a person shall purchase a license endorsement to fund wildlife depredation compensation and prevention, and sportsmen access programs as hereinafter provided.

A person purchasing a resident license pursuant to section 36-406 (a) or (f), Idaho Code, shall pay five dollars ($5.00).

A person purchasing a resident license pursuant to section 36-406 (b), (c), (d), (g) or (h), Idaho Code, shall pay two dollars ($2.00).

A person purchasing a license pursuant to section 36-406 (i), Idaho Code, shall pay ten dollars ($10.00).

A person purchasing a license pursuant to section 36-406 (j), (k), (
l
) or (m), Idaho Code, shall pay four dollars ($4.00).

A person purchasing a nonresident license pursuant to section 36-407(a), (b), (c), (e) or (j), Idaho Code, shall pay ten dollars ($10.00).

A person purchasing a nonresident license pursuant to section 36-407 (i), (k) or (
l
), Idaho Code, shall pay four dollars ($4.00).

A person purchasing a nonresident license pursuant to section 36-407 (m), (n) or (o), Idaho Code, shall pay twenty dollars ($20.00).

A person purchasing a nonresident license pursuant to section 36-407(p) or (q), Idaho Code, shall pay eight dollars ($8.00).

The director shall promptly transmit to the state treasurer all moneys received pursuant to this section for deposit into the fish and game set-aside account for the purposes of section 36-111(1)(f), Idaho Code.

§ 36-415. Discounted license fees.

Upon finding a biological need or public need or unsold licenses, including tags and permits, the commission is authorized to order a discount in fees for specific species, units, areas, zones, or gender as necessary to encourage increased license sales or to encourage hunting, fishing or trapping. The commission is also authorized to order a discount in fees to encourage the purchase of licenses in consecutive years or to encourage the purchase of multiple tags and permits. Notwithstanding the provisions of other law to the contrary, any discounted fee shall be effective only for the time period set by the commission order, and holders of licenses purchased before the discount shall not be entitled to a refund except as provided by rule.

§ 36-416. Schedule of license fees. [Effective until December 1, 2020.]

As used in this section, “N/A” means “not available.”

Sport Licenses

Sport Tags

Sport Permits

Commercial Licenses and Permits

Commercial Tags

Miscellaneous-Other Licenses

Miscellaneous-Other Tags

Miscellaneous-Other Permits-Points-Fees

License Resident Non-Resident

Combination License $ 37.00 $ 238.25

Hunting License 14.00 N/A

Hunting License with 3 Day Fishing License N/A 153.00

Fishing License 28.75 96.50

Sr. Combination License (65 and Older) 12.00 N/A

Sportsman’s Pak License 135.00 N/A

Jr. Combination License 18.00 N/A

Jr. Hunting License 6.50 N/A

Jr. Mentored Hunting License or Disabled

American Veteran Hunting License with

3 Day Fishing License N/A 30.00

Jr. Fishing License 14.25 20.00

Disabled Combination License 4.00 N/A

Disabled Fishing License 4.00 N/A

Military Furlough Combination License 18.75 N/A

Military Furlough Fishing License 18.75 N/A

Small Game Hunting License N/A 96.00

3 Day Small Game Hunting License N/A 33.75

Daily Fishing (1st-day) License 11.75 13.25

Consecutive Day Fishing License 6.00 7.00

3 Day Fishing with Salmon/Steelhead Permit N/A 35.75

Nongame Hunting License N/A 33.75

Jr. Trapping License 6.50 N/A

Trapping License 28.00 300.00

Deer Tag $ 23.00 $ 300.00

Controlled Hunt Deer Tag 23.00 300.00

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Deer Tag 10.75 N/A

Jr. Mentored or Disabled American Veteran

Deer Tag N/A 22.00

Elk A Tag 35.00 415.00

Elk B Tag 35.00 415.00

Controlled Hunt Elk Tag 35.00 415.00

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Elk Tag 17.00 N/A

Jr. Mentored or Disabled American Veteran

Elk Tag N/A 38.00

Black Bear Tag 12.00 184.25
Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Black Bear Tag 6.00 N/A

Jr. Mentored or Disabled American Veteran

Black Bear Tag N/A 22.00

Turkey Tag 21.00 78.25

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Turkey Tag 10.75 N/A

Jr. Mentored or Disabled American Veteran

Turkey Tag N/A 18.00

Mountain Lion Tag 12.00 184.25

Gray Wolf Tag 12.00 184.25

Pronghorn Antelope Tag 34.75 310.00

Moose Tag 198.00 2,100.00

Bighorn Sheep Tag 198.00 2,100.00

Mountain Goat Tag 198.00 2,100.00

Grizzly Bear Tag 198.00 2,100.00

Sandhill Crane Tag 21.00 65.75

Swan Tag 21.00 65.75

For purposes of this subsection, disabled American veteran tags provided to nonresidents shall be limited to holders of a nonresident disabled American veterans hunting license.

Bear Baiting Permit $ 13.25 $ 30.00

Hound Hunter Permit 13.25 168.00

Upland Game Bird Permit 27.00 50.00

Archery Permit 17.75 18.25

Disabled American Veteran Archery Permit 2.00 4.00

Muzzleloader Permit 17.75 18.25

Disabled American Veteran Muzzleloader Permit 2.00 4.00

Salmon Permit 13.50 24.00

Steelhead Permit 13.50 24.00

Federal Migratory Bird Harvest Info. Permit 1.00 3.00

Disabled Archery Permit 0.00 0.00

2-Pole Fishing Permit 13.25 13.75

Turkey Controlled Hunt Permit 6.00 6.00

Sage/Sharptail Grouse Permit 4.00 4.00

Disabled Hunt Motor Vehicle Permit 0.00 0.00

Raptor Captive Breeding Permit $ 78.75 $ 94.50

Falconry Permit 78.75 N/A

Falconry Capture Permit 18.50 168.00

Peregrine Capture Permit 30.00 200.00

Taxidermist-Fur Buyer License

5-Year License 175.00 N/A

1-Year License 38.25 168.25

Shooting Preserve Permit 329.75 N/A

Commercial Wildlife Farm License 137.50 N/A
Commercial Fishing License 110.00 265.00

Wholesale Steelhead License 165.00 198.25

Retail Steelhead Trout Buyer’s License 33.00 39.25

Bobcat Tag $ 3.00 $ 3.00

Otter Tag 3.00 3.00

Net Tag 55.00 65.75

Crayfish/Minnow Tag 1.25 3.00

Duplicate License $ 5.50 $ 6.50

Shooting Preserve License 11.00 22.00

Captive Wolf License 32.00 N/A

Duplicate Tag $ 5.50 $ 6.50

Wild Bird Shooting Preserve Tag 5.50 6.50

Falconry In-State Transfer Permit $ 5.50 $ N/A

Falconry Meet Permit N/A 26.25

Rehab Permit 3.00 3.00

Educational Fishing Permit 0.00 0.00

Live Fish Importation Permit 3.00 3.00

Sport Dog and Falconry Training Permit 3.00 3.00

Wildlife Transport Permit 3.00 3.00

Scientific Collection Permit 50.00 50.00

Private Park Permit 21.75 26.25

Wildlife Import Permit 21.75 26.25

Wildlife Export Permit 11.00 13.25

Wildlife Release Permit 11.00 13.25

Captive Wildlife Permit 21.75 26.25

Fishing Tournament Permit 21.75 25.00

Dog Field Trial Permit 33.00 40.00

Live Fish Transport Permit 21.75 26.25

Controlled Hunt Application Fee

Moose, Sheep, Goat, Grizzly Bear 15.00 40.00

Controlled Hunt Application Fee 4.50 13.00

Fee for Application for the Purchase

of Controlled Hunt Bonus or

Preference Points 4.50 4.50

Nursing Home Fishing Permit 33.00 N/A

§ 36-416. Schedule of license fees. [Effective December 1, 2020.]

As used in this section, “N/A” means “not available.”

Sport Licenses

Sport Tags

Sport Permits

Commercial Licenses and Permits

Commercial Tags

Miscellaneous-Other Licenses

Miscellaneous-Other Tags

Miscellaneous-Other Permits-Points-Fees

License Resident Non-Resident

Combination License $ 37.00 $ 262.25

Hunting License 14.00 N/A

Hunting License with 3 Day Fishing License N/A 183.25

Fishing License 28.75 106.25

Sr. Combination License (65 and Older) 12.00 N/A

Sportsman’s Pak License 135.00 N/A

Jr. Combination License 18.00 N/A

Jr. Hunting License 6.50 N/A

Jr. Mentored Hunting License

with 3 Day Fishing License N/A 90.00

Disabled American Veteran

Hunting License with

3 Day Fishing License N/A 30.00

Jr. Fishing License 14.25 22.00

Disabled Combination License 4.00 N/A

Disabled Fishing License 4.00 N/A

Military Furlough Combination License 18.75 N/A

Military Furlough Fishing License 18.75 N/A

Small Game Hunting License N/A 140.00

3 Day Small Game Hunting License N/A 70.00

Daily Fishing (1st-day) License 11.75 21.00

Consecutive Day Fishing License 6.00 7.00

3 Day Fishing with Salmon/Steelhead Permit N/A 43.00

Nongame Hunting License N/A 37.25

Jr. Trapping License 6.50 N/A

Trapping License 28.00 330.00

Deer Tag $ 23.00 $ 350.00

Controlled Hunt Deer Tag 23.00 350.00

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Deer Tag 10.75 N/A

Jr. Mentored Deer Tag N/A 175.00

Disabled American Veteran

Deer Tag N/A 22.00

Elk A Tag 35.00 650.00

Elk B Tag 35.00 650.00

Controlled Hunt Elk Tag 35.00 650.00

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Elk Tag 17.00 N/A
Jr. Mentored Elk Tag N/A 298.00

Disabled American Veteran

Elk Tag N/A 38.00

Black Bear Tag 12.00 230.00

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Black Bear Tag 6.00 N/A

Jr. Mentored Black

Bear Tag N/A 115.00

Disabled American Veteran

Black Bear Tag N/A 22.00

Turkey Tag 21.00 86.25

Jr. or Sr. or Disabled American Veteran

Turkey Tag 10.75 N/A

Jr. Mentored Turkey Tag N/A 43.00

Disabled American Veteran

Turkey Tag N/A 18.00

Mountain Lion Tag 12.00 202.75

Gray Wolf Tag 12.00 184.25

Pronghorn Antelope Tag 34.75 341.00

Moose Tag 198.00 2,625.00

Bighorn Sheep Tag 198.00 2,625.00

Mountain Goat Tag 198.00 2,625.00

Grizzly Bear Tag 198.00 2,625.00

Sandhill Crane Tag 21.00 72.50

Swan Tag 21.00 65.75

For purposes of this subsection, disabled American veteran tags provided to nonresidents shall be limited to holders of a nonresident disabled American veterans hunting license.

Bear Baiting Permit $ 13.25 $ 33.00

Hound Hunter Permit 13.25 300.00

Upland Game Bird Permit 27.00 55.00

Archery Permit 17.75 80.00

Disabled American Veteran Archery Permit 2.00 4.00

Muzzleloader Permit 17.75 80.00

Disabled American Veteran Muzzleloader Permit 2.00 4.00

Salmon Permit 13.50 26.50

Steelhead Permit 13.50 26.50

Federal Migratory Bird Harvest Info. Permit 1.00 3.25

Disabled Archery Permit 0.00 0.00

2-Pole Fishing Permit 13.25 15.25

Turkey Controlled Hunt Permit 6.00 6.75

Sage/Sharptail Grouse Permit 4.00 4.50

Disabled Hunt Motor Vehicle Permit 0.00 0.00

Raptor Captive Breeding Permit $ 78.75 $ 104.00

Falconry Permit 78.75 N/A
Falconry Capture Permit 18.50 185.00

Peregrine Capture Permit 30.00 220.00

Taxidermist-Fur Buyer License

5-Year License 175.00 N/A

1-Year License 38.25 185.25

Shooting Preserve Permit 329.75 N/A

Commercial Wildlife Farm License 137.50 N/A

Commercial Fishing License 110.00 291.50

Wholesale Steelhead License 165.00 218.25

Retail Steelhead Trout Buyer’s License 33.00 43.25

Bobcat Tag $ 3.00 $ 3.50

Otter Tag 3.00 3.50

Net Tag 55.00 72.50

Crayfish/Minnow Tag 1.25 3.50

Duplicate License $ 5.50 $ 7.25

Shooting Preserve License 11.00 24.25

Captive Wolf License 32.00 N/A

Duplicate Tag $ 5.50 $ 7.25

Wild Bird Shooting Preserve Tag 5.50 7.25

Falconry In-State Transfer Permit $ 5.50 $ N/A

Falconry Meet Permit N/A 29.00

Rehab Permit 3.00 3.50

Educational Fishing Permit 0.00 0.00

Live Fish Importation Permit 3.00 3.50

Sport Dog and Falconry Training Permit 3.00 3.50

Wildlife Transport Permit 3.00 3.50

Scientific Collection Permit 50.00 55.00

Private Park Permit 21.75 29.00

Wildlife Import Permit 21.75 29.00

Wildlife Export Permit 11.00 14.75

Wildlife Release Permit 11.00 14.75

Captive Wildlife Permit 21.75 29.00

Fishing Tournament Permit 21.75 27.50

Dog Field Trial Permit 33.00 44.00

Live Fish Transport Permit 21.75 29.00

Controlled Hunt Application Fee

Moose, Sheep, Goat, Grizzly Bear 15.00 44.00

Controlled Hunt Application Fee 4.50 16.25

Fee for Application for the Purchase

of Controlled Hunt Bonus or

Preference Points 4.50 4.50

§ 36-417. Voluntary donation — Idaho hunters feeding the hungry, inc.

An applicant for a resident or nonresident license as provided for in section 36-416, Idaho Code, may make a voluntary donation of one dollar ($1.00) or more to support the activities of Idaho hunters feeding the hungry, inc., an Idaho nonprofit corporation, in conjunction with his license application. The department shall include a checkoff form to allow an applicant to designate a donation and shall transfer all such funds, less administrative costs associated with the collection of donations, received to Idaho hunters feeding the hungry, inc. on or before July 1 of each year.